District of Columbia statutes.
46-352.09

Credit for payments.

A tribunal of the District shall credit amounts collected for a particular period pursuant to any child-support order against the amounts owed for the same period under any other child-support order for support of the same child issued by a tribunal of the District, another state, or a foreign country.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 209, 63 DCR 222